Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3333
Animal therapist; health care therapy;
conditions; letter of referral; liability.

(1) A licensed animal therapist may perform
health care therapy on an animal only if:

(a) The health
care therapy is consistent with the licensed animal therapist's training required
for the license referred to under subdivision (1) of section 38-3332;

(b) The owner
of the animal presents to the licensed animal therapist a prior letter of
referral for health care therapy that includes a veterinary medical diagnosis
and evaluation completed by a licensed veterinarian who has a veterinarian-client-patient
relationship with the owner and the animal and has made the diagnosis and
evaluation within ninety days immediately preceding the date of the initiation
of the health care therapy; and

(c) The licensed animal therapist provides
health care therapy reports at least monthly to the referring veterinarian,
except that a report is not required for any month in which health care therapy
was not provided.

(2) A licensed veterinarian who prepares a letter of referral for
health care therapy by a licensed animal therapist shall not be liable for
damages caused to the animal as a result of the health care therapy performed
by the licensed animal therapist.

Laws 2009, LB463, § 10.